Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1016
Nebraska crafts and products center,
defined.

Nebraska
crafts and products center means a real estate retail development primarily
selling products created, grown, or assembled in Nebraska. Nebraska crafts
and products must constitute a minimum of fifty percent of the total sales
volume of the development.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 16.